de: Griffmaterial: Aluminium; Bambus; Beryllium; Messing; Bronze; Karbid; Kohlenstoffstahl; Keramik; Kupfer; Kork; Duroplast; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Fiberglas; G-10; Galvanisierter Stahl; Graphit; Eisen; Leder; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Synthetisch; Teflon; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Titan; Holz; Sonstiges
ru: Материал ручки: Алюминий; Бамбук; Бериллий; Латунь; Бронза; Карбид; Углеродистая сталь; Керамика; Медь; Пробка; Дюропласт; Этиленвинилацетат (ЭВА); Стекловолокно; G-10; Оцинкованная сталь; Графит; Железо; Кожа; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Синтетика; Тефлон; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Титан; Дерево; Другое
fr: Matériau du manche: Aluminum; Bambou; Béryllium; Laiton; Bronze; Carbide; Woks en acier au carbone; Céramique; Cuivre; Liège; Duroplaste; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Fibre de verre; G-10; Acier aluminisé; Graphite; Fer; Cuir; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Synthétique; Téflon; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Titane; Bois; Autre
hr-HR: Materijal drške: Aluminij; Bambus; Berilij; Mjed; Bronca; Karbid; Ugljični čelik; Keramika; Bakar; Pluto; Duroplast; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Stakloplastika; G-10; Pocinčani čelik; Grafit; Željezo; Koža; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Sintetika; Teflon; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Titanij; Drvo; Ostalo
es: Material del mango: Aluminio; Bambú; Berilio; Latón; Bronce; Carburo; Acero al carbono; Cerámica; Cobre; Corcho; Duroplástico; Acetato de etileno y vinilo (EVA); Fibra de vidrio; G-10; Acero galvanizado; Grafito; Hierro; Cuero; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Sintético; Teflón; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Titanio; Madera; Otros
th: วัสดุสำหรับที่จับ: อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; เบริลเลียม; ทองเหลือง; สีบรอนซ์; คาร์ไบด์; เหล็กคาร์บอน; เซรามิก; สีทองแดง; ต้นคอร์ก; Duroplast; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะซิเตต (EVA); ไฟเบอร์กลาส; G-10; เหล็กกล้ากัลวาไนซ์; แกรไฟท์; เหล็ก; หนัง; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; สังเคราะห์; เทฟลอน; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); ไทเทเนียม; ไม้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál rukoväte: Hliník; Bambus; Berýlium; Mosadz; Bronzový; Karbid; Uhlíková oceľ; Keramika; Meď; Korok; Duroplast; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Sklolaminát; G-10; Pozinkovaná oceľ; Grafit; Železo; Koža; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Syntetický; Teflón; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Titán; Drevo; Iné
da: Håndtagsmateriale: Aluminum; Bambus; Beryllium; Messing; Bronze; Carbid; Kulstofstål; Keramik; Kobber; Kork; Duroplast; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Glasfiber; G-10; Galvaniseret stål; Grafit; Jern; Læder; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Syntetisk; Teflon; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titanium; Træ; Andet
el: Υλικό λαβής: Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Βηρύλλιο; Ορείχαλκος; Ορείχαλκος; Καρβίδιο; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Κεραμικό; Χαλκός; Φελλός; Duroplast; Πολυμερές αιθυλενίου και οξικού βινυλίου (EVA); Υαλοβάμβακας; G-10; Γαλβανισμένος χάλυβας; Γραφίτης; Σίδερο; Δέρμα; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Τεφλόν; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Τιτάνιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
pl: Materiał uchwytu: Aluminium; Bambus; Beryl; Mosiądz; Brąz; Węgliki; Stal węglowa; Ceramika; Miedź; Korek; Duroplast; Polietylen-co-oktan winylu (EVA); Włókno szklane; G-10; Stal cynkowana; Grafit; Żelazo; Skórzane; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Syntetyczne; Teflon; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Titanium; Drewno; Pozostałe
nl: Greepmateriaal: Aluminium; Bamboe; Beryllium; Messing; Brons; Carbide; Koolstofstaal; Keramiek; Koper; Kurk; Duroplast; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Glasvezel; G-10; Gegalvaniseerd metaal; Grafiet; IJzer; Leer; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Synthetisch; Teflon; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Titanium; Hout; Andere
fi: Kädensijan materiaali: Alumiini; Bambu; Beryllium; Messinki; Pronssi; Karbidi; Hiiliteräs; Keraaminen; Kupari; Korkki; Duroplast; Eteenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Lasikuitu; G-10; Galvanoitu teräs; Grafiitti; Rauta; Nahka; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Synteettinen; Teflon; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Titaani; Puu; Muu
it: Materiale dell’impugnatura: Alluminio; Bamboo; Berillio; Ottone; Bronzo; Carburo; Acciaio al carbonio; Ceramica; Rame; Sughero; Duroplast; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Vetroresina; G-10; Acciaio galvanizzato; Grafite; Ferro; Pelle; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Sintetico; Teflon; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Titanio; Legno; Altro
bg-BG: Материал на дръжката: Алуминий; Бамбук; Берилий; Месинг; Бронз; Карбид; Въглеродна стомана; Керамика; Мед; Корк; Duroplast; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Fiberglass; G-10; Поцинкована стомана; Графит; Желязо; Кожа; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Синтетичен; Тефлон; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Титан; Дърво; Други
ko: 손잡이 소재: 알루미늄; 대나무; 베릴륨; 황동; 청동색; 카바이드; 탄소강; 세라믹; 구리; 코르크; Duroplast; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 유리 섬유; G-10; 아연도금강; 흑연; 철; 가죽; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 인조; Teflon; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 티타늄; 목재; 기타
zh-CN: 手柄材质: 铝; 竹子; 铍; 黄铜; 青铜色; 碳化物; 碳钢; 陶瓷制品; 铜色; 软木; Duroplast; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 玻璃纤维; G-10; 镀锌钢; 石墨; 铁; 皮革; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 合成; Teflon; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 钛; 木头; 其他
tr: Sap malzemesi: Alüminyum; Bambu; Berilyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Karbür; Karbon çelik; Seramik; Bakır; Mantar; Duroplast; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); Fiberglas; G-10; Galvanize çelik; Grafit; Demir; Deri; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Sentetik; Teflon; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Titanyum; Ahşap; Diğer
ja: ハンドルの素材: アルミニウム; バンブー; ベリリウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; カーバイド; カーボン鋼; セラミック; コッパー; コルク; Duroplast; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); ガラス繊維; G-10; 亜鉛メッキスチール; グラファイト; 鉄; レザー; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; 合成品; テフロン; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); チタン; 木材; その他
lt-LT: Rankenos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Bambukas; Berilis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Karbidas; Anglinis plienas; Keramika; Varis; Kamštiena; Duroplastas; Etileno vinilo acetatas (EVA); Stiklo pluoštas; G-10; Galvanizuotas plienas; Grafitas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Oda; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Sintetika; Teflonas; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Titanas; Mediena; Kita
ro-RO: Material mâner: Aluminiu; Bamboo; Beriliu; Alamă; Bronz; Carbură; Oțel carbon; Ceramic; Cupru; Plută; Duroplast; Etilen acetat de vinil (EVA); Fibră de sticlă; G-10; Otel galvanizat; Grafit; Iron; Piele; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Sintetic; Teflon; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Titan; Lemn; Altele
sv: Handtagsmaterial: Aluminium; Bambu; Beryllium; Mässing; Brons; Karbid; Kolstål; Keramisk; Koppar; Kork; Duroplast; Etenvinylacetat (EVA); Glasfiber; G-10; Galvaniserat stål; Grafit; Järn; Läder; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Syntetisk; Teflon; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titan; Trä; Annat
pt-BR: Material do cabo: Alumínio; Bambu; Berílio; Latão; Bronze; Carboneto; Aço carbono; Cerâmica; Cobre; Cortiça; Duroplast; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Fibra de vidro; G-10; Aço galvanizado; Grafite; Ferro; Couro; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Sintético; Teflon; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Titânio; Madeira; Outro
en: Handle material: Aluminum; Bamboo; Beryllium; Brass; Bronze; Carbide; Carbon steel; Ceramic; Copper; Cork; Duroplast; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Fiberglass; G-10; Galvanized steel; Graphite; Iron; Leather; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Synthetic; Teflon; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Titanium; Wood; Other
hu: Fogantyú anyaga: Alumínium; Bambusz; Berillium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Karbid; Szénacél; Kerámia; Réz; Parafa; Duroplaszt; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Üveggyapot; G-10; Horganyzott acél; Grafit; Vas; Bőr; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Szintetikus; Teflon; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Titán; Fa; Egyéb
zh-TW: 握把材質: 鋁; 竹子; 鈹; 黃銅; 銅色; 碳化物; 碳素鋼; 陶瓷; 紅銅色; 軟木; Duroplast; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物; 玻璃纖維; G-10; 鍍鋅鋼; 石墨; 鐵; 皮製; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 合成; Teflon; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 鈦; 木材; 其他
cs: Materiál rukojeti: Hliník; Bambus; Berylium; Mosaz; Bronzová; Karbid; Uhlíková ocel; Keramika; Měděná; Korek; Duroplast; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Skelná vata; G-10; Galvanizovaná ocel; Grafit; Železo; Kůže; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Syntetické; Teflon; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Titanové; Dřevo; Jiné
pt-PT: Material da pega: Alumínio; Bambu; Berílio; Latão; Bronze; Carboneto; Aço carbono; Cerâmica; Cobre; Cortiça; Duroplástico; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Fibra de vidro; G-10; Aço galvanizado; Grafite; Ferro; Pele; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Sintético; Teflon; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Titânio; Madeira; Outro
sl-SI: Material ročaja: Aluminij; Bambus; Berilij; Medenina; Bron; Karbid; Ogljikovo jeklo; Keramika; Baker; Pluta; Duroplast; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Steklena vlakna; G-10; Pocinkano jeklo; Grafit; Železo; Usnje; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Sintetika; Teflon; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Titan; Les; Drugo
nb: Håndtaksmateriale: Aluminium; Bambus; Beryllium; Messing; Bronse; Karbid; Karbonstål; Keramikk; Kobber; Kork; Duroplast; Etylenvinylacetat (EVA); Glassfiber; G-10; Galvanisert stål; Grafitt; Jern; Skinn; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Syntetisk; Teflon; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titan; Trevirke; Annen
vi: Xử lý vật liệu: Nhôm; Tre; Beryli; Đồng; Màu đồng; Cacbua; Thép carbon; Gốm; Màu đồng đỏ; Thảm gỗ bần; Duroplast; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Sợi thủy tinh; G-10; Thép mạ kẽm; Than chì; Sắt; Da; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Tổng hợp; Chân may Teflon; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Titanium; Gỗ; Khác